Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.128

Application of Title 77 RCW.

Certain animals defined in this chapter as livestock or animal may also meet the definition of wildlife contained in Title 77 RCW. This chapter does not allow importation, possession, or uses of animals that are in violation of Title 77 RCW or the rules adopted under that title, nor does it relieve the owners or possessors of wildlife from full compliance with the requirements of Title 77 RCW or the rules adopted under that title. Rules adopted by the director shall not allow importation, possession, or uses of animals that are in violation of Title 77 RCW or the rules adopted under that title.

[ 1998 c 8 s 18.]